New York, session 2025-2026, A477.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. The vehicle and traffic law is amended by adding a new 2 section 404-ff to read as follows: 3 § 404-ff. Distinctive plates for retired members of the New York state 4 legislature. 1. Any retired member of the New York state legislature 5 residing in this state shall, upon request, be issued a license plate 6 bearing the words "Retired NYS Legislator". Application for said license 7 plate shall be filed with the commissioner in such form and detail as 8 the commissioner shall prescribe, and shall be verified annually by the 9 applicant. 10 2. The distinctive plate authorized in this section shall be issued 11 upon proof, satisfactory to the commissioner, that the applicant is a 12 retired member of the New York state legislature. 13 3. A distinctive plate issued pursuant to this section shall be issued 14 in the same manner as other number plates upon payment of the regular 15 registration fee prescribed by section four hundred one of this article, 16 provided, however, that an additional annual service charge of twenty- 17 five dollars shall be charged for such plate. 18 § 2. 1. A distinctive plate established pursuant to section 404-ff of 19 the vehicle and traffic law, as added by section one of this act, shall 20 only be designed, produced and issued upon the delivery to the depart- 21 ment of motor vehicles of a surety bond in the amount of six thousand 22 dollars, which shall be executed by a surety company authorized by the 23 department of financial services to transact business in this state. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD01989-01-5 A. 477 2 1 Provided, however, that if the commissioner of motor vehicles shall have 2 received prior to plate design, production and issuance at least two 3 hundred orders for such distinctive plate together with the additional 4 annual service charge applicable to each such order, which shall be 5 non-refundable, no such surety bond shall be required. All service 6 charges collected pursuant to this section shall be deposited pursuant 7 to the provisions of section 404-oo of the vehicle and traffic law to 8 the credit of the department of motor vehicles distinctive plate devel- 9 opment fund established by section 95-g of the state finance law and 10 shall be used for the design, production, advertising and distribution 11 of distinctive license plates in accordance with such section 95-g. 12 2. If, upon the expiration of two years following the date upon which 13 distinctive plates in the series are first available for sale two 14 hundred or more sets of such plates are sold, a bond delivered pursuant 15 to this section shall be discontinued. If fewer than two hundred sets of 16 such plates are sold by such time, the department of motor vehicles 17 shall be entitled to recover against the bond in an amount proportionate 18 to such shortfall. 19 § 3. This act shall take effect on the one hundred eightieth day after 20 it shall have become a law; provided, however, that section two of this 21 act shall take effect immediately. Effective immediately, the addition, 22 amendment and/or repeal of any rule or regulation necessary for the 23 implementation of this act on its effective date are authorized to be 24 made and completed on or before such effective date.